New York, session 2025-2026, S3808.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 6801 of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 4-a to read as follows: 3 4-a. A licensed pharmacist may administer immunizations to prevent 4 influenza to a person nine years of age or older. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 6 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02083-01-5